Arkansas, session 2025, SB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-619, concerning meetings requirements
for school district boards of directors, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(f)(1)(A) Prior to the consideration of any business or an executive
session at a meeting of a board of directors, any member of the public shall
be afforded the opportunity to give public comment on any matter that is
within the powers and duties of the board of directors as provided under § 6-
13-620 if the member of the public providing the public comment:
(i) Resides within the public school district;
(ii) Is a parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to a student enrolled in the public school district; or
(iii) Is employed by the public school district.
(i) Resides within the public school district;
*TNL107*
04-09-2025 10:59:38 TNL107

As Engrossed: S1/27/25 S2/5/25 S2/10/25 H4/7/25 H4/9/25 SB90
(ii) Is a parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to a student enrolled in the public school district; or
(iii) Is employed by the public school district.
(B) However, a member of the public shall not provide
public comment that prejudices the board of directors concerning a student or
personnel matter that is on the agenda for the board of director's
consideration of a disciplinary or employment action.
(2)(A) A board of directors shall not require prior approval for
a member of the public to give public comment under subdivision (f)(1) of
board of directors.
(3) A board of directors shall allow each member of the public
who presents public comment under subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section at
least three (3) minutes to deliver his or her public comment.
(4) If the public comment period at the beginning of a board of
directors meeting exceeds thirty (30) minutes, the board of directors may
move public comment on matters within the powers and duties of the board of
directors as provided under § 6-13-620 that are not on the board of directors
meeting agenda for action to a time later in the board of directors meeting.
(B) However, a board of directors may utilize a sign-up
sheet for members of the public providing public comment so long as the sign-
up sheet is accessible to the public until the start of the meeting of the
board of directors.
(3) A board of directors shall allow each member of the public
who presents public comment under subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section at
least three (3) minutes to deliver his or her public comment.
(4) If the public comment period at the beginning of a board of
directors meeting exceeds thirty (30) minutes, the board of directors may
move public comment on matters within the powers and duties of the board of
directors as provided under § 6-13-620 that are not on the board of directors
meeting agenda for action to a time later in the board of directors meeting.

/s/J. English




04-09-2025 10:59:38 TNL107